Utah statutes.
31A-32a-103.   Establishing medical care savings accounts.
(1)  For a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1995:
(a)  an employer, except as otherwise provided by contract or a collective
bargaining agreement, may offer a medical care savings account program to the
employer's employees; or
(b)  a resident individual may establish a medical care savings account
program for the individual or for the individual's dependents.
(2) (a)  A contribution into an account made by an employer on behalf of an
employee, or made by an individual account holder may not exceed the greater
of:
(i)  $2,000 in any taxable year; or
(ii)  an amount of money equal to the sum of all eligible medical expenses
paid by the employee or account holder for that taxable year on behalf of the
employee, account holder, or the employee's or account holder's spouse or
dependents.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(a)(ii), eligible medical expenses are
limited to expenses in the taxable year that an insurance carrier has applied
to the employee's or account holder's deductible.
(3)  An employer that offers a medical care savings account program shall,
before making any contributions:
(a)  inform all employees in writing of the fact that these contributions may
not be deductible under the federal tax laws; and
(b)  obtain from the employee a written election to participate in the medical
care savings account program.
(4)  Except as provided in Sections 31A-32a-105 and 59-10-114, principal
contributed to and interest earned on a medical care savings account and money
reimbursed to an employee or account holder for eligible medical expenses are
exempt from taxation.
(5) (a)  An employer may select a single account administrator for all of the
employer's employee's medical care savings accounts.
(b)  If a single account administrator is not selected, an employer may
contribute directly to the account holder's individual medical care savings
account.
